Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1118
Jury; retrial on discharge.

In all cases where the jury are discharged during the trial, or after the cause is submitted to them, it may be tried again immediately or at a future time as the court may direct.

R.S.1867, Code § 289, p. 442;

R.S.1913, § 7857;

C.S.1922, § 8801;

C.S.1929, § 20-1118;

R.S.1943, § 25-1118.